Wyoming, session 2026, HB0164.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-4-227 is created to read:

9-4-227. Wyoming generational investment account.

HB0164

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0392
(a) There is created the Wyoming generational
investment account. The account shall consist of all funds
transferred or appropriated to the account by law. All
monies deposited or transferred into the account are
intended to be inviolate and constitute a permanent or
perpetual trust fund, subject to the provisions for the
withdrawal of funds provided by this section.

(b) The state treasurer shall invest all funds within
the Wyoming generational investment account in accordance
with W.S. 9-4-715(a) and (c) through (e) and 9-4-716. W.S.
9-4-716(e) shall not apply to the account. The state
treasurer, or the treasurer's designee, which shall be
registered under the federal Investment Advisor's Act of
1940, as amended and if required to be registered by the
terms of that act, may invest the unobligated, unencumbered
balance of the account in equities, including stocks of
corporations. The account shall be invested so that the
overall risk profile of the account's investments shall not
materially exceed the risk profile of a reference portfolio
that consists of eighty-five percent (85%) private equity
and fifteen percent (15%) private credit investments. In
adopting investment policy statements for the account, the
HB0164

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0392
state loan and investment board shall seek to preserve the
balance of the account in a manner that strives for the
highest possible risk-adjusted total net return consistent
with an appropriate level of safety and liquidity, giving
consideration to the account's potential extended
investment period and the extended period during which
monies in the account may be ineligible for withdrawal.

(c) Beginning on July 1, 2026 and on each July 1
thereafter, the state auditor shall transfer one hundred
million dollars ($100,000,000.00), or as much thereof as is
available without reducing the unexpended, unobligated
balance of the legislative stabilization reserve account to
under one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000.00), from the
legislative stabilization reserve account to the Wyoming
generational investment account. The transfer under this
subsection shall occur after all other transfers and
appropriations from the legislative stabilization reserve
account required by law for the fiscal year are made.

(d) Transfers made under subsection (c) of this
section, and the investment of those transfers, shall be in
accordance with all of the following:
HB0164

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0392

(i) The state treasurer shall separately account
for the attribution of earnings from each annual transfer
made under subsection (c) of this section and shall
separately account for all earnings from each annual
transfer;

(ii) Annual transfers shall not be withdrawn
from the account;

(iii) Investment earnings from each annual
transfer shall not be withdrawn except in accordance with
subsection (e) of this section.

(e) Beginning on July 1 for each fiscal year starting
twenty (20) fiscal years after a transfer is made under
subsection (c) of this section, all investment earnings in
the Wyoming generational investment account arising from
the annual transfer to the account made twenty (20) fiscal
years earlier shall be transferred and deposited in
accordance with this subsection. For purposes of this
subsection:

HB0164

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0392
(i) "Investment earnings" mean all interest
income, dividends, realized capital gains and returned
capital;

(ii) Investment earnings shall be transferred in
accordance with the following:

(A) One-half (1/2) of the investment
earnings specified in this subsection shall be transferred
to the general fund;

(B) One-half (1/2) of the investment
earnings specified in this subsection shall be transferred
to the legislative stabilization reserve account for
investment in accordance with W.S. 9-4-715(q)(iii).

(iii) Investment earnings shall be distributed
under this subsection as the earnings are received or when
the fund from which earnings are derived matures.

Section 2. W.S. 9-2-1013(d)(iii) by creating a new
subparagraph (E), 9-4-203(a)(xiii) and 9-4-716(e) are
amended to read:
HB0164

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0392

9-2-1013. State budget; distribution of copies to
legislators; copies and reports of authorizations;
interfund loans.

(d) In addition to the items contained in subsection
(a) of this section and notwithstanding any other
recommendations made by the governor, the state budget
shall also include the governor's recommendations for
appropriations for the ensuing two (2) years, or if a
supplemental budget request, the remainder of the budget
period, subject to the following:

(iii) The total recommended appropriations under
this subsection shall not include any of the following:

(E) The appropriation, diversion or
transfer of any funds deposited from the Wyoming
generational investment account in accordance with W.S.
9-4-227(e).

9-4-203. Definitions.

HB0164

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0392
(a) As used in this act:

(xiii) "This act" means W.S. 9-4-202 through
9-4-226 9-4-227.

9-4-716. State investment policy; investment
consultant.

(e) In investing monies of a fund or account which
may be invested in stock of a corporation or other
equities, the overall risk profile of the investments,
excluding any specific public purpose investment authorized
or directed by the legislature, shall not materially exceed
the risk profile of a reference portfolio that consists of
seventy percent (70%) global equities and thirty percent
(30%) domestic fixed income investments. The state
treasurer after consultation with the investment funds
committee shall submit to the board the committee's
recommendations of specific benchmarks for the measurement
of the portfolio risk characteristics. The specific
benchmarks shall be determined by the board. Any provision
of law which restricts or expands the investment of a
specific fund or account to a greater degree than the
HB0164

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0392
provisions of this subsection shall control over this
subsection.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0164